3rdparty/hunspell/tests/ph2.aff
# switch off ngram suggestion to test
# usage of ph: dictionary fields in REP
# suggestions
SET UTF-8

MAXNGRAMSUGS 0

# test in compounds, too
COMPOUNDFLAG Y

# test also dictionary items with space,
# and forbidden compounding, if there is
# a ph: field with that compound as
# mispelling in the dictionary
CHECKCOMPOUNDREP

# test in compound word with affixes
SFX A Y 1
SFX A 0 's .

# when the ph: field ends with the character *,
# strip last character of the pattern and the replacement
# to match in REP suggestions also at character changes,
# for example, "pretty ph:prity*" results "prit->prett"
# REP replacement instead of "prity->pretty", to get
# prity->pretty and pritiest->prettiest suggestions.

SFX B Y 2
SFX B y iest [^aeiou]y
SFX B ö őt ö

WORDCHARS '
