3rdparty/hunspell/tests/ph2.dic
9
foo ph:bar ph:baz
foo bar ph:foobar
word/Y ph:baz
stem/Y ph: ph:
forbidden/Y
root/YA
forbidden root/A ph:forbiddenroot
pretty/B ph:prity*
foobarö/B ph:fubarő*
happy/B ph:hepy ph:hepi->happi
