3rdparty/hunspell/tests/ph2.wrong
bar
baz
foobar
bazstem
stembaz
stembazstem
forbiddenroot
forbiddenroot's
rootforbiddenroot
prity
pritiest
fubarö
fubarőt
hepy
hepiest
